Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB928.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of January 25, 1966 (1965 P.L.1542, No.538), entitled "An act creating a Commonwealth of Pennsylvania Council on the Arts, for the encouragement and development of the various arts, and making an appropriation therefor," is amended by adding a section to read:Section 5.1. (a) The Pennsylvania Film Producer Grant Program is established within the council to provide grants in accordance with this section. The program shall be administered by the council. The council shall have the following duties:(1) Develop and establish criteria for the program, including all of the following:1234567891011121314151617181920 (i) An application form for a grant.(ii) A process for the following:(A) The submittal and review of a completed application form for a grant, including a timeline for making a determination to award the grant and notice of the award of the grant.(B) The disbursement of a grant. (C) The general management of the program, including the maintenance of records regarding grants.(2) Submit the criteria for the program to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin and post the criteria on the council's publicly accessible Internet website.(3) Advertise the availability of the program to potential applicants in a manner designed to maximize participation by eligible Pennsylvania film producers.(b) The council may award grants to an eligible Pennsylvania film producer for the following purposes:(1) Costs associated with site preparation and set construction for filming a film project.(2) Costs associated with hiring crew members for filming a fi lm project. (3) Any other costs that meet the criteria established by the council under subsection (a) for producing a film project by a P ennsylvania film producer. (c) To qualify for a grant, a film producer shall meet the following requ irements: (1) The film producer shall maintain its principal place of business in this Commonwealth.(2) The film project for which the grant is sought shall be filmed entirely within this Commonwealth.20250SB0928PN1063 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (d) The Pennsylvania Film Producer Grant Program Account is established as a restricted account within the General Fund. Money in the restricted account is appropriated on a continuing basis to the council for the award of grants under this section.(e) All money appropriated, allocated or donated to the restricted account, including money received from the Commonwealth, private entities or other sources, shall be deposited into the restricted account.(f) Interest earned from the investment of money in the restricted account shall be deposited into the restricted account and used for the purposes specified under subsection (d).(g) At the end of each fiscal year, money remaining in the restricted account that is unexpended, unencumbered or uncommitted shall lapse and be transferred to the General Fund.(h) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Council." T he Commonwealth of Pennsylvania Council on the Arts."Eligible Pennsylvania film producer." A film producer that meets the requirements under subsection (c)."Film." A feature film, a television film, a television talk or game show series, a television commercial or a television pilot or each episode of a television series which is intended as programming for a national audience. The term does not include a production featuring news, current events, weather and market reports, public programming, sports events, awards shows or other gala events, a production that solicits funds, a production containing obscene material or performances as 20250SB0928PN1063 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 5903(b) (relating to obscene and other sexual materials and performances) or a production primarily for private, political, industrial, corporate or institutional purposes."Program." The Pennsylvania Film Producer Grant Program established under subsection (a)."Restricted account." The Pennsylvania Film Producer Grant Program Account established under subsection (d).Section 2. Repeals are as follows:(1) The General Assembly declares that the repeal under paragraph (2) is necessary to effectuate the addition of section 5.1 of the act.(2) Section 1716-D(e) of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is repealed.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0928PN1063 - 4 - 12345678910111213141516